Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0050.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 14b. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 408 to 420 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 408.1035(5) Person H MIOSHA violation causing employee death 1 Person G MIOSHA violation causing employee death â subsequent offense 3 408.1035a(5) Person H MIOSHA violation causing employee death 1 Person G MIOSHA violation causing employee death â subsequent offense 3 409.122(2) Person G Employment of children during certain hours â second offense 2 Person E Employment of children during certain hours â third or subsequent offense 10 409.122(3) Person D Employment of children in child sexually abusive activity 20 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 49 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.